Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. County Road Commissioner.

§ 65-17-1.
Establishment of county road department; appointment of county road manager; powers and duties of manager.

This section, relating to the establishment of a county road department, the employment of a county road manager and prescribing the powers and duties of the county road manager, shall not be mandatory in any county which is not required to operate under a countywide system of road administration; provided, however, such county may, by order of the board of supervisors, adopt all or part of the procedures prescribed by this section.

The board of supervisors of each county shall establish a county road department. The board of supervisors shall adopt the general policies to be followed in administration of the county road department and shall appoint as administrative head of the county road department a county road manager who shall be educated or experienced in the construction and maintenance of highways, bridges and other facets of county highway responsibilities. Provided, however, that in any county which, on July 1, 1988, employed two (2) county road managers each of whom managed an administrative division of the county for road construction and maintenance, the board of supervisors may continue to employ two (2) county road managers. The county road manager shall not be a member of the board of supervisors. The county road manager, under the policies determined by the board of supervisors and subject to the board’s general supervision and control, shall administer the county road department, superintend the working, construction and maintaining of the public roads and the building of bridges in such county, and carry out the general policies of the board in conformity with the estimates of expenditures fixed in the annual budget as finally adopted by the board or as thereafter revised by appropriate action of the board. All requisitions for the purchase and repair of all equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials and services for the county road department shall be prepared by the county road manager and submitted to the county department of purchasing for processing in accordance with the central purchasing system. The county road manager shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board of supervisors and may be removed from such position by a majority vote of the board.

The county road manager shall receive such compensation, to be paid from the county road and bridge funds, as the board of supervisors shall determine. The county road manager, before entering upon his duties, shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty in such amount as may be approved by the board of supervisors, but not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00).

A county may appoint as county road manager the same person whom it has under the law employed as its county engineer for its state aid road system, provided that such county road manager is being compensated by the county for serving as county road manager and for all duties, if any, that he performs as county engineer by payment of an annual salary and not on the basis of a percentage of the cost of road projects.

Nothing shall preclude one (1) person from serving two (2) or more counties as county road manager by agreement between such counties.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require new county personnel to be employed but, to the extent practicable, an existing county employee shall be appointed as the county road manager.

The responsibility for construction and maintenance of all “local farm roads” (including bridges) as the same are defined in Sections 65-9-1 and 65-9-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, together with all functions not vested by law in the county state aid engineer in the construction and maintenance of state aid roads shall be vested in the county’s road department.

The county road manager each year shall prepare, or shall assist the county administrator (if one has been appointed) in the preparation of, a tentative road budget containing all proposed expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year for construction and maintenance of county roads and bridges and the operation of the county road department. Such tentative road budget shall be submitted to the board of supervisors for incorporation, with such modification as the board may adopt, in the county budget, as prescribed by law.

The county road manager shall employ, subject to approval of the board of supervisors, such assistants and employees as may be necessary in conformity with the budget and county policies and procedure with respect to personnel and subject to approval of the board as to salary or other compensation to be paid. He shall have supervision and jurisdiction over personnel and assignments of personnel engaged in the work of the road department. He may purchase, lease or hire such equipment and purchase such materials and supplies as may be necessary for operation of the county road department in conformity with the budget, in accordance with the central purchase system and existing laws and subject to approval of the board as to price or rental. He shall have jurisdiction over the assignment of equipment needed in performance of the work of the county road department.

The board of supervisors may, by a majority vote of the entire board, supersede any act of the road manager or change, modify or revoke any act which has been completed by the road manager, provided the change, modification or revocation does not constitute a breach of contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. 7157d; 1930, § 6398; 1942, § 8346; Laws, 1920, ch. 276; Laws, 1928, ch. 157; Laws, 1952, ch. 223; Laws, 1960, ch. 209; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess. ch. 29, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 44; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 56; Laws, 1991, ch. 461 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1991).

§ 65-17-3.
Compensation in certain counties.

In any counties lying in two levee districts through which the Yazoo River flows, traversed by U.S. Highway No. 49W and in which Mississippi Highways Nos. 12, 14, and 7 run, the board of supervisors is authorized, in its discretion, to compensate any such road commissioner of said county in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month.

In any counties bordering on the Pearl River, in which U.S. Highway No. 80 intersects Mississippi Highway No. 18, and having a population in excess of thirty-four thousand in the 1960 federal decennial census, the board of supervisors is authorized, in its discretion, to compensate any such road commissioner of said county in an amount not to exceed Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) per month.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7157d; 1930, § 6398; 1942, § 8346; Laws, 1920, ch. 276; Laws, 1928, ch. 157; Laws, 1952, ch. 223; Laws, 1960, ch. 209; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess. ch. 29, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved December 28, 1966).

§ 65-17-5.
Duties of commissioner.

It shall be the duty of such commissioner to supervise the construction of such highways and their maintenance after the construction, and to see that the directions for such construction and maintenance are carried out, calling to his assistance, when necessary, the service of a competent civil engineer, which civil engineer shall receive for his services a reasonable compensation to be fixed by the board of supervisors, to be paid out of the funds arising from the proceeds of the sale of such bonds and the levy of such maintenance tax as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7250; 1930, § 6399; 1942, § 8347; Laws, 1914, ch. 175.

§ 65-17-7.
Commissioner to report to supervisors.

Such highway commissioner shall, from time to time as required by the board of supervisors, report to the board his acts and doings touching his official duties, and all of his acts shall be subject to the approval or rejection of the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7251; 1930, § 6400; 1942, § 8348; Laws, 1914, ch. 175.

§ 65-17-9.
Authority to transfer surplus county road department equipment to another department of county government without reimbursement to road and bridge fund.

Upon a determination by the board of supervisors that (a) equipment of the county road department has ceased to be used for purposes of the road department; and (b) such equipment has been owned by the road department for at least three (3) years; and (c) such equipment may be of use or benefit to another department of county government; and (d) the transfer of the equipment to another department of county government would promote the best interest of county government; and (e) upon the unanimous approval of the board of supervisors, such surplus equipment may be transferred to any other department of county government without the necessity of reimbursement to the road and bridge fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 334, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).